South Dakota, session 2026, SB200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 13-13-10.1 be AMENDED:
13-13-10.1. The education funding terms and procedures referenced in this
chapter are defined as follows:
(1) Nonresident students who are in the care and custody of the Department of Social
Services, the Unified Judicial System, the Department of Corrections, or other state
agencies and are attending a public school may be included in the fall enrollment
of the receiving district when enrolled in the receiving district;
(2) "Fall enrollment," is calculated as follows:
(a) Determine the number of kindergarten through twelfth grade students
enrolled in all schools operated by the school district on the last Friday of
September of the current school year;
(b) Subtract the number of students for whom the district receives tuition
except for:
(i) Nonresident students who are in the care and custody of a state
agency and are attending a public school district; and
(ii) Students who are being provided an education pursuant to § 13-28-
11; and
(c) Add the number of students for whom the district pays tuition.
When computing state aid to education for a school district pursuant to § 13-13-
73, the secretary of the Department of Education shall use the school district's fall
enrollment;
(3) "Target teacher ratio factor," is:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.477.23 2 200
(a) For school districts with a fall enrollment of two hundred or less, the target
teacher ratio factor is 12;
(b) For districts with a fall enrollment of greater than two hundred, but less
than six hundred, the target teacher ratio factor is calculated as follows:
(i) Multiplying the fall enrollment by .00750; and
(ii) Adding 10.50 to the resulting product; and
(c) For districts with a fall enrollment of six hundred or greater, the target
teacher ratio factor is 15.
The fall enrollment used for the determination of the target teacher ratio for a
school district may not include any students residing in a residential treatment
facility when the education program is operated by the school district;
(4) "English learner (EL) adjustment," is calculated by multiplying 0.25 times the
number of kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade students who, in the prior school
year, scored below level four on the state-administered language proficiency
assessment as required in the state's consolidated state application pursuant to
§ 1111(b)(2)(G) of the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015;
(5) "Index factor," is the annual percentage change in the consumer price index for
urban wage earners and clerical workers as computed by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the year before the year
immediately preceding the year of adjustment or three percent, whichever is less;
(6) "Target teacher salary," for the school fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, is
$62,821.19. Each school fiscal year thereafter, the target teacher salary is the
previous fiscal year's target teacher salary increased by the index factor;
(7)(6) "Target teacher benefits," is the target teacher salary multiplied by twenty-nine
percent;
(8)(7) "Target teacher compensation," is the sum of the target teacher salary and the
target teacher benefits;
(9)(8) "Overhead rate," is thirty-eight and seventy-eight-hundredths percent. Beginning
in school fiscal year 2018, the overhead rate must be adjusted to take into account
the sum of the amounts that districts exceed the other revenue base amount;
(10)(9) "Local need," is calculated as follows:
(a) Divide the fall enrollment by the target teacher ratio factor;
(b) If applicable, divide the English Learner adjustment pursuant to subdivision
(4) by the target teacher ratio factor;
(c) Add the results of subsections (a) and (b);
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.477.23 3 200
(d) Multiply the result of subsection (c) by the target teacher compensation;
(e) Multiply the product of subsection (d) by the overhead rate;
(f) Add the products of subsections (d) and (e) and subdivision (20);
(g) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amounts set
aside for costs related to technology in schools and statewide student
assessments;
(h) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amounts set
aside for sparse school district benefits, calculated pursuant to §§ 13-13-
78 and 13-13-79; and
(i) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amounts set
aside for career and technical education calculated pursuant to §§ 13-13-
81 and 13-13-82;
(11)(10) "Alternative per student need," is calculated as follows:
(a) Add the total need for each school district for school fiscal year 2016,
including the small school adjustment and the English learner adjustment,
to the lesser of the amount of funds apportioned to each school district in
the year preceding the most recently completed school fiscal year or school
fiscal year 2015 pursuant to §§ 10-33-24, 10-35-21, 10-36-10, 10-43-77,
11-7-73, 13-13-4, and 23A-27-25; and
(b) Divide the result of (a) by the September 2015 fall enrollment, excluding
any adjustments based on prior year student counts;
(12)(11) "Alternative local need," may only be used by a school district created or
reorganized before July 1, 2016, and is the alternative per student need multiplied
by the fall enrollment, excluding any adjustments based on prior year student
counts;
(13)(12) "Local effort," the amount of ad valorem taxes generated in a school fiscal year
by applying the levies established pursuant to § 10-12-42. Beginning on July 1,
2017, local effort includes the amount of funds apportioned to each school district
in the year preceding the most recently completed school fiscal year pursuant to
§§ 10-33-24, 10-35-21 as provided by subdivision (15), 10-36-10, 10-43-77, 11-
7-73, 13-13-4, and 23A-27-25 and that exceeds the other revenue base amount;
(14)(13) "Other revenue base amount," is zero;
(15)(14) "Wind energy tax revenue," any wind energy tax revenue apportioned to school
districts pursuant to § 10-35-21 from a wind farm producing power for the first
time before July 1, 2016, is considered local effort pursuant to subdivision (13) and
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.477.23 4 200
other revenue base amount pursuant to subdivision (14). However, for wind energy
tax revenue apportioned to a school district from a wind farm producing power for
the first time after June 30, 2016, one hundred percent must be retained by the
school district to which the tax revenue is apportioned for the first five years of
producing power, eighty percent for the sixth year, sixty percent for the seventh
year, forty percent for the eighth year, twenty percent for the ninth year, and zero
percent thereafter. If a wind farm begins producing power for the first time
between October first and December thirty-first in a calendar year, any revenues
generated for that time period must be retained by the school district and that time
period may not be counted against the first five-year period;
(16)(15) "Per student equivalent," for funding calculations that are determined on a per
student basis, the per student equivalent is calculated as follows:
(a) Multiply the target teacher compensation times the sum of one plus the
overhead rate; and
(b) Divide subsection (a) by 15;
(17)(16) "Monthly cash balance," the total amount of money for each month in the
school district's general fund, calculated by adding all deposits made during the
month to the beginning cash balance and deducting all disbursements or payments
made during the month;
(18)(17) "General fund base percentage," is determined as follows:
(a) Forty percent for a school district with a fall enrollment as defined in
subdivision (2) of two hundred or less;
(b) Thirty percent for a school district with fall enrollment as defined in
subdivision (2) of more than two hundred but less than six hundred; and
(c) Twenty-five percent for a school district with fall enrollment as defined in
subdivision (2) greater than or equal to six hundred.
When determining the general fund base percentage, the secretary of the
Department of Education shall use the lesser of the school district's fall enrollment
as defined in subdivision (2) for the current school year or the school district's fall
enrollment from the previous two years;
(19)(18) "Allowable general fund cash balance," the general fund base percentage
multiplied by the district's general fund expenditures in the previous school year;
and
(20)(19) "Alternative instruction participation adjustment," is calculated by multiplying
0.10 times the number of children who participated in the prior school year in high
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.477.23 5 200
school interscholastic activities sanctioned or sponsored by the South Dakota High
School Activities Association, as permitted by § 13-36-7, while receiving
alternative instruction pursuant to § 13-27-3, multiplied by the per student
equivalent defined in this section.
Section 2. That § 13-13-71 be AMENDED:
13-13-71. If local effort increases on a statewide aggregate basis by a greater
percentage than local need on a statewide aggregate basis from any one year to the next,
for the following year each of the levies specified in subdivision 13-13-10.1(13) shall,
which, when added together, constitute local effort, must be reduced proportionally so
that the percentage increase in local effort on a statewide aggregate basis equals the
percentage increase in need on a statewide aggregate basis.
Section 3. That § 13-13-73 be AMENDED:
13-13-73. No later than July 1, 2016, a school district shall notify the secretary
of education in writing as to whether the school district's state aid is to be calculated using
the alternative local need calculation.A school district may use the alternative local need
calculation only if the school district was created or reorganized before July 1, 2016.
If a school district chooses is eligible and elects to use the alternative local need
calculation, the school district shall must notify the secretary in writing no later than,
before July first of each subsequent fiscal year, as to whether to continue to use the school
district is to use the alternative local need calculation for that fiscal year. If an eligible
school district elects to use the alternative local need calculation, state aid to the district
is calculated by subtracting the local effort from alternative local need. If the district's
local effort is greater than the district's alternative local need, state aid to the district is
zero.
If a school district elects not to use the alternative local need calculation or is not
eligible to use the alternative local need calculation, state aid is calculated by subtracting
the local effort from the local need. If the district's local effort is greater than the district's
local need, state aid to the district is zero. If a school district chooses not to use the
alternative local need calculation, the school district may not use that calculation in any
subsequent school year.
The secretary of the Department of Education shall compute state aid to education
for each school district according to the following calculations:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.477.23 6 200
(1) For school districts not utilizing the alternative local need calculation, state aid is
local need as defined in § 13-13-10.1 minus local effort, or zero if the calculation
is a negative number;
(2) For school districts utilizing the alternative local need calculation, state aid is the
alternative local need as defined in subdivision 13-13-10.1(12) minus local effort,
or zero if the calculation is a negative number;
(3)
If the state aid appropriation for the general support of education is in excess of
the entitlement provided for in this section and the entitlement provided for in § 13-13-
85, the excess shall must be used to fund any shortfall of the appropriation as provided
for in § 13-37-36.3.
The secretary shall report to the Governor by January seventh of each year, the
amount of state aid necessary to fully fund the general aid formula in the current year. If
a shortfall in the state aid appropriation for general education exists that cannot be
covered by § 13-37-45, the Governor shall must inform the Legislature and provide a
proposal to eliminate the shortfall.
Section 4. That § 13-37-16.2 be AMENDED:
13-37-16.2. If local effort increases on a statewide aggregate basis by a greater
percentage than local need on a statewide aggregate basis from any one year to the next,
for the following year, the levy specified in subdivision 13-37-35.1(7) shall constituting
local effort, as defined in § 13-37-35.1 must be reduced proportionally so that the
percentage increase in local effort on a statewide aggregate basis equals the percentage
increase in need on a statewide aggregate basis.
Section 5. That § 13-37-35.1 be AMENDED:
13-37-35.1. Terms used in chapter 13-37 mean:
(1) "Level one disability," a mild disability;
(2) "Level two disability," cognitive disability or emotional disorder;
(3) "Level three disability," hearing impairment, deafness, visual impairment, deaf-
blindness, orthopedic impairment, or traumatic brain injury;
(4) "Level four disability," autism;
(5) "Level five disability," multiple disabilities;
(5A)(6) "Level six disability," prolonged assistance;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.477.23 7 200
(6) "Index factor," is the annual percentage change in the consumer price index for
urban wage earners and clerical workers as computed by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the year before the year
immediately preceding the year of adjustment, or three percent, whichever is less;
(7) "Local effort," must be calculated for taxes payable in 2026 and thereafter using a
special education levy of one dollar and twenty-six and two-tenths cents per one
thousand dollars of valuation;
(8) "Allocation for a student with a level one disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $7,650.45. For each school year thereafter, the allocation
for a student with a level one disability must be the previous fiscal year's allocation
for the child increased by the index factor;
(9) "Allocation for a student with a level two disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $16,759.91. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level two disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(10) "Allocation for a student with a level three disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $23,139.68. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level three disability must be the previous fiscal
year's allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(11) "Allocation for a student with a level four disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $18,053.89. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level four disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(12) "Allocation for a student with a level five disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $37,039.28. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level five disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(12A)(13) "Allocation for a student with a level six disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $11,838.15. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level six disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(13)(14) "Child count," is the number of students in need of special education or
special education and related services according to criteria set forth in rules
promulgated pursuant to §§ 13-37-1.1 and 13-37-46 submitted to the Department
of Education;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.477.23 8 200
(14)(15) "Fall enrollment," the number of kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade
students enrolled in all schools operated by the school district on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year minus the number of students for whom
the district receives tuition, except any nonresident student who is in the care and
custody of a state agency and is attending a public school and any student for
whom tuition is being paid pursuant to § 13-28-42.1, plus the number of students
for whom the district pays tuition;
(15)(16) "Nonpublic school," a sectarian organization or entity accredited by the
secretary of education for the purpose of instructing children of compulsory school
age. This definition excludes any school that receives a majority of its revenues
from public funds;
(16)(17) "Nonpublic fall enrollment," the number of children under age eighteen, who
are approved for alternative instruction pursuant to § 13-27-3 on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year plus:
(a) For nonpublic schools located within the boundaries of a public school
district with a fall enrollment of six hundred or more on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year, the number of kindergarten-
through-twelfth-grade students enrolled on the last Friday of September of
the previous regular school year in all nonpublic schools located within the
boundaries of the public school district;
(b) For nonpublic schools located within the boundaries of a public school
district with a fall enrollment of less than six hundred on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year, the number of resident
kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade students enrolled on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year in all nonpublic schools located
within this state;
(17)(18) "Special education fall enrollment," fall enrollment plus nonpublic fall
enrollment;
(18)(19) "Local need," an amount to be determined as follows:
(a) Multiply the special education fall enrollment by 0.1062 and multiply the
result by the allocation for a student with a level one disability;
(b) Multiply the number of students having a level two disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level two disability;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.477.23 9 200
(c) Multiply the number of students having a level three disability as reported
on the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level three disability;
(d) Multiply the number of students having a level four disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level four disability;
(e) Multiply the number of students having a level five disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level five disability;
(f) Multiply the number of students having a level six disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level six disability;
(g) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amount set
aside for extraordinary expenses defined in § 13-37-40;
(h) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amount set
aside for the South Dakota School for the Blind and Visually Impaired; and
(i) Sum the results of subdivisions (18)(a) to (h), inclusive; and
(19)(20) "Effort factor," the school district's special education tax levy in dollars per
thousand divided by $1.262. The maximum effort factor is 1.0.
Section 6. That § 13-37-55 be AMENDED:
13-37-55. Up to fifteen percent of the local need as defined in subdivision 13-37-
35.1(18) § 13-37-35.1 may be used to develop and implement coordinated, early
intervening services for students in kindergarten through grade twelve who are not
currently identified as needing special education or special education and related services,
but who need additional academic and behavioral interventions to succeed in a general
education environment to prevent them from being identified as having a special education
disability.
Coordinated, early intervening services include:
(1) Professional development for teachers and other school staff to enable them to
deliver scientifically-based scientifically based academic instruction and behavioral
interventions, including scientifically-based scientifically based literacy instruction,
and, if appropriate, instruction on the use of adaptive and instructional software;
and
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.477.23 10 200
(2) Providing The provision of educational and behavioral evaluations, services, and
supports, including scientifically-based scientifically based literacy instruction.
Section 7. That § 13-39-75 be AMENDED:
13-39-75. The presidents of the technical colleges, acting pursuant to rules
established by the State Board of Technical Education, shall use the money provided
pursuant to SL 2016, chapter 65, to increase instructor salaries to competitive levels at
each technical college. The amount of money provided each year shall must be increased
by the index factor as defined in proportion to the change in the target teacher salary, as
established in § 13-13-10.1.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.